Utah statutes.
16-6a-1005.   Articles of amendment to articles of incorporation.
A nonprofit corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver
to the division for filing articles of amendment setting forth:
(1)  the name of the nonprofit corporation;
(2)  the text of each amendment adopted;
(3)  the date of each amendment's adoption;
(4)  if the amendment was adopted by the board of directors or incorporators
without member action, a statement to that effect and that:
(a)  the nonprofit corporation does not have members; or
(b)  member action was not required;
(5)  if the amendment was adopted by the members, a statement that the number
of votes cast for the amendment by the members or by each voting group
entitled to vote separately on the amendment was sufficient for approval by
the members or voting group respectively; and
(6)  if approval of the amendment by some person or persons other than the
members, the board of directors, or the incorporators is required pursuant to
Section 16-6a-1013, a statement that the approval was obtained.
